apertium-cy-en.cy.dix.xml
    <pardef n="byr__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Plural form -->
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ion</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>red</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rach</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>raf</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cyn/nar__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nar</l>
          <r>nar<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>harach</l>
          <r>nar<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>haraf</l>
          <r>nar<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/drwg__adj">
      <e>
	<par n="initial-d"/>
        <p>
          <l>rwg</l>
          <r>rwg<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<par n="initial-g_d"/>
        <p>
          <l>waeth</l>
          <r>rwg<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<par n="initial-g_d"/>
        <p>
          <l>waethaf</l>
          <r>rwg<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="d/wfn__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wfn</l>
          <r>wfn<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yfnach</l>
          <r>wfn<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yfnaf</l>
          <r>wfn<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tl/awd__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>awd</l>
          <r>awd<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>oted</l>
          <r>awd<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>otach</l>
          <r>awd<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>otaf</l>
          <r>awd<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="e/ang__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ang</l>
          <r>ang<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hangach</l>
          <r>ang<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>angaf</l>
          <r>ang<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="da__adj">
      <e>
	<par n="initial-d"/>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<par n="initial-g_null"/>
        <p>
          <l>well</l>
          <r>da<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="initial-g_null"/>
        <p>
          <l>orau</l>
          <r>da<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cyn/nes__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nes</l>
          <r>nes<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hesach</l>
          <r>nes<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hesaf</l>
          <r>nes<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="aml/wg__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wg</l>
          <r>wg<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ycach</l>
          <r>wg<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ycaf</l>
          <r>wg<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="caredig__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="hu/awdl__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>awdl</l>
          <r>awdl<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>otled</l>
          <r>awdl<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="gwly/b__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>b</l>
          <r>b<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ped</l>
          <r>b<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>



    <pardef n="te/g__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>g</l>
          <r>g<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ced</l>
          <r>g<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tl/ws__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ws</l>
          <r>ws<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ysed</l>
          <r>ws<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bu/dr__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dr</l>
          <r>dr<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>tred</l>
          <r>dr<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ha/gr__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gr</l>
          <r>gr<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>cred</l>
          <r>gr<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


<!-- verbs -->

	<pardef n="ddaru__vaux">
	  <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="invariant"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="nid-er-elw"><i>nid-er-elw</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="amlwg"><i>aml</i><par n="aml/wg__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="byr"><par n="initial-b"/><i>yr</i><par n="byr__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cynnar"><par n="initial-c"/><i>yn</i><par n="cyn/nar__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cynnes"><par n="initial-c"/><i>yn</i><par n="cyn/nes__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="da"><i/><par n="da__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="drwg"><i/><par n="/drwg__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dwfn"><par n="initial-d"/><i/><par n="d/wfn__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="eang"><i>e</i><par n="e/ang__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tlawd"><par n="initial-t"/><i>l</i><par n="tl/awd__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="academaidd"><i>academaidd</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="adeiledig"><i>adeiledig</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="agoriadol"><i>agoriadol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Fictorianaidd"><i>Fictorianaidd</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="amhoradwy"><i>amhoradwy</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="amodol"><i>amodol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="anadferadwy"><i>anadferadwy</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="anfesuradwy"><i>anfesuradwy</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="anghyfartal"><i>anghyfartal</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="anghytbwys"><i>anghytbwys</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="annerbyniol"><i>annerbyniol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="anorfod"><i>anorfod</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="arbenigol"><i>arbenigol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="arfog"><i>arfog</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="arunigol"><i>arunigol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="atodol"><i>atodol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="benyw"><par n="initial-b"/><i>enyw</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="boddhaus"><par n="initial-b"/><i>oddhaus</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="budr"><par n="initial-b"/><i>u</i><par n="bu/dr__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="hagr"><i>ha</i><par n="ha/gr__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="budron"><par n="initial-b"/><i>udron</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cadarnhaol"><par n="initial-c"/><i>adarnhaol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="caniataol"><par n="initial-c"/><i>aniataol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cartesaidd"><par n="initial-c"/><i>artesaidd</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="chwarterol"><par n="initial-c"/><i>hwarterol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cludadwy"><par n="initial-c"/><i>ludadwy</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cost-effeithlon"><par n="initial-c"/><i>ost-effeithlon</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="croyw"><par n="initial-c"/><i>royw</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cydamseredig"><par n="initial-c"/><i>ydamseredig</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cyfan"><par n="initial-c"/><i>yfan</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cyffredinol"><par n="initial-c"/><i>yffredinol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cyfreithiol"><par n="initial-c"/><i>yfreithiol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cyhyd"><par n="initial-c"/><i>yhyd</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cymesurol"><par n="initial-c"/><i>ymesurol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cynenedigol"><par n="initial-c"/><i>ynenedigol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cytûn"><par n="initial-c"/><i>ytûn</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="deallusol"><par n="initial-d"/><i>eallusol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dewr"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ewr</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="diflanedig"><par n="initial-d"/><i>iflanedig</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dirymedig"><par n="initial-d"/><i>irymedig</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dwyreiniol"><par n="initial-d"/><i>wyreiniol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="eglur"><i>eglur</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="epidemiolegol"><i>epidemiolegol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="fforddiadwy"><i>fforddiadwy</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="gofodol"><par n="initial-g"/><i>ofodol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="gwahân"><par n="initial-g"/><i>wahân</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="gwlyb"><par n="initial-g"/><i>wly</i><par n="gwly/b__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="gwreiddiol"><par n="initial-g"/><i>wreiddiol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="hecto"><i>hecto</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="huawdl"><i>hu</i><par n="hu/awdl__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="hyfforddiadol"><i>hyfforddiadol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lladin"><par n="initial-ll"/><i>adin</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="llwgr"><par n="initial-ll"/><i>wgr</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="marwol"><par n="initial-m"/><i>arwol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="moesol"><par n="initial-m"/><i>oesol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="oedrannus"><i>oedrannus</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="penigamp"><par n="initial-p"/><i>enigamp</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="presennol"><par n="initial-p"/><i>resennol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rhagarweiniol"><par n="initial-rh"/><i>agarweiniol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rhugl"><par n="initial-rh"/><i>ugl</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="segur"><i>segur</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="strwythuredig"><i>strwythuredig</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tebygol"><par n="initial-t"/><i>ebygol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="teg"><par n="initial-t"/><i>e</i><par n="te/g__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tlws"><par n="initial-t"/><i>l</i><par n="tl/ws__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="trist"><par n="initial-t"/><i>rist</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="unffurf"><i>unffurf</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ymddangosiadol"><i>ymddangosiadol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ddaru"><i>ddaru</i><par n="ddaru__vaux"/></e>
	<e lm="dwn i ddim"><i>dwn<b/>i<b/>ddim</i><par n="ddaru__vaux"/></e>
